Missouri, session 2026, HB3256.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.215, to read as follows:
407.215. 1. Except as provided under subsection 2 of this section, all retail
establishments, including, but not limited to, sports venues, concert venues, halls, fairs,
and Missouri State High School Activities Association (MSHSAA) events offering goods
or services for sale shall accept United States currency, including Federal Reserve notes,
from a buyer to purchase the goods or services.
2. This section does not apply to:
(1) Any retail transaction conducted at fuel-dispensing equipment through an
automated, unattended, or self-service system, without on-site personnel to accept or
secure cash payments;
(2) Any online retail transaction of any kind;
(3) Any retail transaction that requires:
(a) A security deposit be placed on a credit card; or
(b) A credit card number be provided to cover unforeseen damages or expenses;
(4) Any retail establishment that uses a device to convert a consumer's cash into
a prepaid card that allows the consumer to complete a transaction at the retail
establishment if:
(a) The transaction does not include a fee;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3256 2
(b) The transaction does not require a minimum deposit amount greater than
one dollar;
(c) Upon request, the consumer is provided with a receipt indicating the amount
of cash the consumer deposited onto the prepaid card; and
(d) The underlying moneys on the prepaid card are not subject to an expiration
date, and there is no limit on the number of transactions that may be completed using
the prepaid card; or
(5) Any retail establishment with more than one point of sale at a single address
if one or more points of sale at the address accept United States currency, including
Federal Reserve notes.
3. Failing to accept United States currency from a buyer as required by this
section is a class D misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not
more than five hundred dollars per transaction or attempted transaction.
✔